Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 1. Administration.

Sec. 23.05.010.
Purpose.

The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall foster and promote the welfare of the wage earners of the state, improve their working conditions, and advance their opportunities for profitable employment.

History.

(§ 43-1-1 ACLA 1949)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 23.05.020.
Records of department.

The department shall keep a record of all proceedings.
All records shall be open during regular hours of business for public inspection.

History.

(§ 43-1-3 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 23.05.030.
Funds.

The department shall remit to the Department of Revenue all money it receives and sign and issue vouchers for necessary disbursements.

History.

(§ 43-1-3 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 23.05.040.
Bond of commissioner.

The commissioner shall give bond approved by the Department of Administration in the sum of $10,000 running to the state, conditioned upon the faithful performance of the duties of the office.
The bond shall be filed with the Department of Administration.

History.

(§ 43-1-3 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 23.05.050.
Power to issue subpoenas and take testimony.

The department may issue subpoenas, administer oaths, and take testimony concerning any matter within its jurisdiction.

History.

(§ 43-1-4 ACLA 1949)

Administrative Code. —

For occupational safety and health review board, see 8 AAC 61, art. 3.

Sec. 23.05.055.
Electronic filing.

Notwithstanding any contrary provision of the law, if the commissioner determines by order that it is in the public interest, the commissioner may authorize electronic filing of certain information with the department in a format prescribed by the department as an additional means of filing under this title. If the commissioner authorizes electronic filing, the department shall consider the electronic filing as equivalent to paper filing for purposes of compliance with other requirements of this title. Electronic filings authorized under this section are equivalent to paper filings for the purposes of civil or criminal penalties for violations of this title or AS 11.

History.

(§ 1 ch 50 SLA 2013)

Effective dates. —

Section 14, ch. 50, SLA 2013 makes this section effective July 1, 2013.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 50, SLA 2013 (HB 76), see 2013 House Journal 70 — 71.

Sec. 23.05.060.
Powers of the department.

The department may

enforce all state labor laws;

act as mediator and appoint deputy commissioners of conciliation in labor disputes whenever it considers the interest of industrial peace requires it;

make investigations and collect and compile statistical information concerning the conditions of labor generally and upon all matters relating to the enforcement of this chapter;

institute court proceedings against an employer of labor without cost to the employee when it is satisfied that the employer has failed to pay an employee an amount due by contract;

issue cease and desist orders and other orders and regulations necessary for the enforcement of state labor laws;

in accordance with AS 37.07 (the Executive Budget Act), receive and spend money derived from agreements with local governments, nongovernmental organizations, or other persons.

History.

(§ 43-1-5 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 34 SLA 1949; am § 2 ch 15 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 107 SLA 1975; am § 43 ch 138 SLA 1986; am § 30 ch 41 SLA 2009)

Administrative Code. —

For employment of minors 14 and 15 years of age, see 8 AAC 5, art. 1.

For minimum wages and overtime, see 8 AAC 15, art. 2.

For exemptions, see 8 AAC 15, art. 3.

For reduction of wages, see 8 AAC 15, art. 4.

For transportation of employees, see 8 AAC 20.

For payment of wages, see 8 AAC 25.

For wages and hours, see 8 AAC 30, art. 1.

For investigations and hearings, see 8 AAC 30, art. 4.

For debarment, see 8 AAC 30, art. 5.

For holder in possession and application for certificate of fitness, see 8 AAC 90, art. 1.

For plumber certificate of fitness, see 8 AAC 90, art. 2.

For electrician certificate of fitness, see 8 AAC 90, art. 3.

For renewal and cancellation of electrical and plumbing certificate of fitness, see 8 AAC 90, art. 4.

For continuing education, see 8 AAC 90, art. 5.

For right of inspection, see 8 AAC 90, art. 7.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, in (3), added “and” following “make investigations”, and made a stylistic change.

Sec. 23.05.065.
Fees for publications, research data, and other services.

The commissioner may establish by regulation and the department may charge reasonable fees for department publications, research data, and other centralized administrative services to cover the cost of reproduction, printing, mailing, distribution, and other centralized administrative services.

History.

(§ 15 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Sec. 23.05.067.
Service fees for administration of workers’ safety and compensation programs.

Each insurer providing workers’ compensation insurance and each employer who is self-insured or uninsured for purposes of AS 23.30 in this state shall pay an annual service fee to the department for the administrative expenses of the state for workers’ safety programs under AS 18.60 and the workers’ compensation program under AS 23.30 as follows:

for each employer,

except as provided in (b) of this section, the service fee shall be paid each year to the department at the time that the annual report is required to be filed under AS

23.30.155(m)

or (n); and

the service fee is 2.9 percent of all payments reported to the division of workers’ compensation in the department under AS

23.30.155(m)

or (n), except second injury fund payments; and

for each insurer, the director of the division of insurance shall, under (e) of this section, deposit from funds received from the insurer under AS

21.09.210

a service fee of 2.5 percent of the direct premium income for workers’ compensation insurance received by the insurer during the year ending on the preceding December 31, subject to all the deductions specified in AS

21.09.210

(b).

An employer who is required to pay an annual service fee under (a) of this section may elect to pay in yearly increments over a five-year period the portion of the service fee due under (a) of this section as a result of a settlement of over $50,000 approved under AS

23.30.012

. An election under this subsection must be made in the first year that a service fee would be due as a result of the settlement. The employer shall notify the department of an election under this subsection. If an election is made, payment of each yearly increment that is due shall be made at the time the annual report is required to be filed under AS

23.30.155(m)

or (n).

Payment of the annual service fee under this section shall be made in the manner and by the method specified by the department.

If an employer who is required to pay an annual service fee under this section does not pay the required amount of the service fee by the time specified in this section, the employer shall pay a civil penalty of $100 for the first day the payment is late and $10 a day for each additional day the payment is late. The civil penalty under this subsection is in addition to any civil penalties imposed for late filings of reports under AS

23.30.155(m)

.

Annual service fees and civil penalties collected under this section and AS

23.30.155(c)

and (m) shall be deposited in the workers’ safety and compensation administration account in the state treasury. Under AS

37.05.146(c)

, the service fees and civil penalties shall be accounted for separately, and appropriations from the account are not made from the unrestricted general fund. The legislature may appropriate money from the account for expenditures by the department for necessary costs incurred by the department in the administration of the workers’ safety programs contained in AS 18.60 and of the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Act contained in AS 23.30. Nothing in this subsection creates a dedicated fund or dedicates the money in the account for a specific purpose. Money deposited in the account does not lapse at the end of a fiscal year unless otherwise provided by an appropriation.

The department may adopt regulations to implement this section.

Notwithstanding AS

21.76.020(a)

, a joint insurance arrangement established under AS 21.76 is subject to the provisions of this section and regulations adopted under this section and, if self-insured, is subject to the annual service fee on behalf of its members.

The department shall grant a credit against the service fee imposed under (a)(1) of this section to an employer if (1) the employer applies to the department for the credit on a form prescribed by the department; (2) the employer provides proof that the employer has paid a premium tax imposed under AS

21.09.210

on an insurance policy; and (3) workers’ compensation claims have been paid under the insurance policy described in (2) of this subsection and the claims are subject to the service fee imposed under (a) of this section. The credit allowed under this subsection is equal to the amount of the premium tax paid by the employer under the insurance policy, may not exceed the service fee imposed under (a) of this section, and only applies to premium taxes paid by the employer on or after January 1, 2000.

In this section, “insurer” has the meaning given in AS

21.97.900

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 89 SLA 2000; am § 31 ch 41 SLA 2009; am §§ 1, 2 ch 91 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2002, in subsection (e), “ AS

37.05.146(c)

” was substituted for “ AS

37.05.146

(b)” to reflect the 2002 renumbering of
AS

37.05.146

. In 2010, in subsection (i), “ AS

21.97.900

” was substituted for “ AS

21.90.900

” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of
AS

21.90.900

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, in (a)(1)(B), substituted “division of workers’ compensation in the department” for “Alaska Worker’s Compensation Board”.

The 2018 amendment, effective November 22, 2018, in (a)(2), substituted “2.5 percent” for “1.82 percent” following “a service fee of”; in (e), inserted “and AS

23.30.155(c)

and (m)” following “under this section” in the first sentence.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for ch. 91, SLA 2018 (HB 79), the basis for the 2018 amendments to this section, see 2017 House Journal 97 — 101.

Sec. 23.05.070.
Accounting and disposition of receipts. [Repealed, § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991.]

Sec. 23.05.080.
Employer’s records.

An employer shall keep an accurate record of the name, address, and occupation of each person employed, of the daily and weekly hours worked by each person, and of the wages paid each pay period to each person. The record shall be kept on file for at least three years.

History.

(§ 43-1-6 ACLA 1949; am § 2 ch 107 SLA 1975)

Administrative Code. —

For compensation, medical benefits, and proceedings before the Alaska Workers’ Compensation Board, see 8 AAC 45.

Sec. 23.05.090.
Employer shall furnish information.

An employer shall furnish to the department the information it is authorized to require, and shall make true and specific answers to all questions, whether submitted orally or in writing, authorized to be asked of the employer.

History.

(§ 43-1-7 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 23.05.100.
Inspections and examination of records.

The department may

enter a place of employment during regular hours of employment and in cooperation with the employer, or someone designated by the employer, collect facts and statistics relating to the employment of workers;

make inspections for the proper enforcement of all state labor laws;

for the purpose of examination, have access to and copy from any book, account, record, payroll, paper, or document relating to the employment of workers.

History.

(§ 43-1-8 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 23.05.110.
Biennial report.

The department shall submit a report to the governor concerning its activities during the preceding two years. The department shall notify the legislature that the report is available.

History.

(§ 43-1-9 ACLA 1949; am § 44 ch 21 SLA 1995)

Sec. 23.05.120.
Cooperation with other agencies.

The department may negotiate with the United States Department of Labor and with other federal and state agencies the arrangements that it considers expedient for cooperation in formulating and carrying out policies and projects designed to encourage and assist in the protection and welfare of labor of the state.

History.

(§ 43-1-10 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 23.05.125.
Office of citizenship assistance.

The office of citizenship assistance is established in the office of the commissioner. The office shall

provide employment information and referrals to services for legal aliens, including employment services, such as job placement services, and information about how labor unions, administrative agencies, and court actions may be used to deal with claims or charges of job discrimination, illegal termination of employment, sexual harassment, and unsafe working conditions; and

advise the commissioner on

improving employment opportunities for legal aliens;

preventing employment discrimination against legal aliens; and

cooperating with state and federal agencies to accomplish the office’s mission.

In this section, “legal alien” means an individual who resides in Alaska, is not a citizen of the United States, and is in compliance with the individual’s federal visa requirements.

History.

(§ 1 ch 167 SLA 2004)

Sec. 23.05.130.
Preference for resident workers.

The department shall aid and assist resident workers to obtain, safeguard, and protect their rightful preference to be employed in industries in the state.

History.

(§ 43-1-11 ACLA 1949)